New Mexico, session 2026, HB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 30-22-25 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1971,
Chapter 265, Section 5) is amended to read:
"30-22-25. AGGRAVATED BATTERY UPON A PEACE OFFICER.--
A. Aggravated battery upon a peace officer
consists of the unlawful touching or application of force to
the person of a peace officer with intent to injure that
peace officer while the officer is in the lawful discharge of
the officer's duties.
B. Whoever commits aggravated battery upon a peace
officer, inflicting an injury to the peace officer that is
not likely to cause death or great bodily harm, but does
cause painful temporary disfigurement or temporary loss or
impairment of the functions of any member or organ of the
body, is guilty of a fourth degree felony.
C. Whoever commits aggravated battery upon a peace

officer inflicting great bodily harm, or does so with a

deadly weapon or in any manner whereby great bodily harm or

death can be inflicted, is guilty of a second degree felony."

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the

provisions of this act is July 1, 2026.
HB 61
Page 1